Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 4

Restrictive Covenants

66-9-401. Effect of waiver.

Any waiver of a restrictive covenant applicable to a subdivision lot, when granted for a specifically named business, shall be effective as a waiver for any other business, regardless of name, which operates substantially the same type of business as the business for which the waiver was originally granted.

Acts 1992, ch. 686, § 1.

66-9-402. Exemptions from actions.

No action shall lie in any court of law or equity against an owner or lessee of real property whose use of real property satisfies the conditions established in §66-9-401 and in which it is alleged that the owner or lessee of the real property has violated restrictive covenants as to the use of property.

Acts 1992, ch. 686, § 2.

66-9-403. Applicability.

This part shall not be construed to apply to preservation restrictions, solar easements, or conservation easements, as defined in this chapter, or to any waiver of a restrictive covenant which by its express terms states that this part shall not be applicable.

Acts 1992, ch. 686, § 3.